Massachusetts, session 194th, H3017.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end of section 2,
subsection (a)(2) the following:—
(k) Amounts paid during the taxable year by a self-employed individual, as defined in
section 401(c)(I)(B) of the Code, for insurance which constitutes medical care for the self-
employed individual, their spouse and dependents.
of 1